Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 7 Georgia Fire Academy

25-7-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Fire Academy Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1725, § 1.

25-7-2.
Creation; purposes.

There is created the Georgia Fire Academy, the purposes of which shall be, through training and research:

To reduce the costs in suffering and property loss resulting from fire;

To provide professional training to paid, volunteer, and other publicly or privately employed firefighters at a minimal cost to them and their employers;

To assist the state and its counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions and the officers thereof in the investigation and determination of the causes of fires;

To develop new methods of fire prevention and fire fighting;

To provide facilities for testing fire-fighting and prevention equipment; and

To assist the state and its counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions in the training and operations of fire department-related emergency medical services and rescue services.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1725, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11.

25-7-3.
“Board” defined.

As used in this chapter, “board” means the Board of Public Safety.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 431, § 1, effective July 1, 1980, abolished the Georgia Fire Academy Board. By the same law the General Assembly decreed that the Board of Public Safety replace any reference to the Georgia Fire Academy Board.

25-7-4.
Powers and duties of Board of Public Safety as to academy generally; selection and compensation of superintendent of academy; creation of advisory council; selection and reimbursement of members.

The Board of Public Safety is authorized and empowered to establish, operate, and maintain the Georgia Fire Academy for the purposes enumerated in Code Section 25-7-2. The board is authorized and empowered to do all things and to take whatever action is necessary to accomplish these purposes, including, but not limited to, the establishment and conduct of training programs and the promulgation of rules and regulations relative thereto. The board shall select the superintendent of the academy and shall fix the compensation for the superintendent.

The board is authorized and directed to create an advisory council to advise and assist it in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this chapter. The membership of the advisory council shall be as the board determines, except that such membership shall include at least one representative from each of the following organizations: the Association County Commissioners of Georgia, the Georgia Municipal Association, and the Insurance Services Office. The director of the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council shall also be a member of the advisory council. The members of the advisory council shall serve without compensation, but they may be reimbursed in the same manner as state officials and employees for travel and other expenses actually incurred by them in carrying out their duties as members of the council.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1725, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 431, § 2.

25-7-5.
Responsibilities of superintendent of academy.

The superintendent of the Georgia Fire Academy shall be responsible for the selection of a staff. He shall also be responsible for the execution of all policies, programs, directives, and decisions promulgated by the Board of Public Safety and for the direction of the staff and the daily operation of the academy.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1725, § 5.

25-7-6.
Administrative assignment of academy to Department of Public Safety; acceptance of gifts, grants, and donations by board.

The Georgia Fire Academy is assigned to the Department of Public Safety for administrative purposes only, as described in Code Section 50-4-3.

The Board of Public Safety is authorized to accept gifts, grants, and donations for the purposes of carrying out this chapter. The board is also authorized to accept property, both real and personal, and services for the purposes of carrying out this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1725, § 6.

25-7-7.
Persons to whom training programs to be made available; establishing fees; eligibility.

Subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the Board of Public Safety, the training program of the academy shall be made available to all firefighters and may also be made available to other persons who evidence interest in entering the fire-fighting profession. The board is authorized to prescribe fees to cover all or a part of the cost of furnishing the training, under such rules and regulations as the board shall prescribe. The state, municipalities, and counties are authorized to expend funds for the purpose of paying such fees. The board is given full authority to decide who shall be allowed to enroll in the training program of the academy.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1725, § 7.

25-7-8.
Requirement of attendance at academy training programs; effect of academy training programs upon other training programs.

It is not the intention of this chapter that it be mandatory that any firefighter be required to attend the academy. The training program established at the academy shall not supersede any training program for firefighters now in existence or hereafter established but shall be separate and apart from any other training programs for firefighters.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1725, § 8.